Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-369.06
Unpaid civil penalties; collection.

Civil penalties assessed pursuant to section 75-369.03 and unpaid shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the form of a lien foreclosure or recovered in a proper form of action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of Lancaster County. Any civil penalty collected shall be remitted on a monthly basis to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 358, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB845, § 3.